Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3212
Districts; change of boundaries, division, or merger; application; contents; filing; when effective; Secretary of State; duties.

If the boards of the affected districts favor a change of boundaries, division, or merger as provided by sections 2-3211 to 2-3211.02, the various affected district boards shall each present to the Secretary of State an application, signed by them, for a certificate evidencing the change, division, or merger. The application shall be filed with the Secretary of State accompanied with a statement by the department certifying that the change, division, or merger is in accordance with the procedures prescribed in sections 2-3207 to 2-3212 and setting forth any new boundary line or other information as in the judgment of the department and Secretary of State is adequate to describe such change, division, or merger. When the application and statement have been filed with the Secretary of State, the change, division, or merger shall be deemed effective and the Secretary of State shall issue to the directors of each of the districts a certificate evidencing the change, division, or merger.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 12, p. 107;

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 55.